Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1760.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 9601, 9602 heading, (a) and (c), 9603, 9604, 9605, 9606 and 9607 of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 9601. Definitions.Subject to section 9602 (relating to policy and regulations), 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 the following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Aspirational target." A target established by the Secretary of General Services under section 9603 (relating to Statewide participation goal and aspirational target)."Commonwealth agency." As defined in 62 Pa.C.S. § 103 (relating to definitions)."Contract-specific goal." A goal established by the Department of General Services in collaboration with the purchasing agency for utilization of veteran business enterprises on a specific procurement."Disparity study." A study conducted to determine whether a disparity exists between the availability of veteran business enterprises and the Commonwealth's utilization of veteran business enterprises."Executive agency." As defined in 62 Pa.C.S. § 103 [(relating to definitions)]."Purchasing agency." As defined in 62 Pa.C.S. § 103 [(relating to definitions)]."Service-disabled." Being in possession of:(1) a disability rating letter issued by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or(2) a disability determination from the United States Department of Defense."Service-disabled veteran-owned small business." A small business owned and controlled by:(1) a service-disabled veteran or veterans; [or(2) if approved by the Department of General Services, a surviving spouse or permanent caregiver of a service-disabled 20250HB1760PN2168 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 veteran.](2) if approved by the Department of General Services, a spouse of a disabled veteran who has been classified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs' Veterans Benefits Administration as having a permanent total disability;( 3) if approved by the Department of General Services, a surviving spouse who is an unmarried spouse of a deceased or service-disabled veteran or of a service member who died on active duty in the United States Armed Forces, including a reserve component or National Guard; or(4) if approved by the Department of General Services, a permanent caregiver of a service-disabled veteran."Small business." As defined in 62 Pa.C.S. § 2102 (relating to definitions)."State-affiliated entity." As defined in 62 Pa.C.S. § 103 [(relating to definitions)]."Utilization schedule." A document, submitted by a bidder or offeror as part of a bid or proposal, in which a bidder or offeror commits to a level of veteran business enterprise participation for a contract, identifies the associated responsibilities and scopes of work and identifies the dollar value or percentages of the work to be performed."Veteran." An individual who served in the United States Armed Forces, including a reserve component or the National Guard, and who was discharged or released from service under conditions other than dishonorable."Veteran business enterprise." Any of the following:(1) A veteran-owned small business.(2) A service-disabled veteran-owned small business.20250HB1760PN2168 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Veteran-owned small business." A small business owned and controlled by a veteran or veterans.§ 9602. [Regulations] Policy and regulations.(a) Promulgation.--The Department of General Services shall establish policy [in accordance with this subchapter] for executive agencies and those independent agencies [and may, in consultation with the department, promulgate regulations establishing detailed definitions of the words and phrases defined in section 9601 (relating to definitions) using, in addition to the criteria set forth in section 9601, other criteria as it deems appropriate, including the number of employees and the dollar volume of business.] for which the Department of General Services acts as a purchasing agency. The Department of General Services in its discretion may promulgate regulations. The policy or regulations may establish detailed definitions of the words and phrases defined under section 9601 (relating to definitions) using, in addition to the criteria specified under section 9601, other criteria as the Department of General Services deems appropriate, including the number of employees and the dollar volume of business.* * *(c) Antifraud provisions.--The Department of General Services shall establish policy and promulgate regulations establishing antifraud provisions to deter and penalize businesses that [are not owned by those who are service-disabled or by veterans but who falsely claim that they are] falsely claim the businesses are owned by service-disabled individuals or veterans in order to receive any [action] status authorized by this subchapter.* * *20250HB1760PN2168 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 9603. [Participation goal.] Statewide participation goal and aspirational target.A Statewide annual goal of not less than [3%] 5% participation by [veteran-owned small businesses, including service-disabled veteran-owned small businesses,] veteran business enterprises is established. [ The participation goal shall apply to the total value of all contracts available to small businesses in each fiscal year.] The Secretary of General Services may set a Statewide aspirational target for veteran business enterprise participation which may be reviewed and adjusted every five years upon completion of a disparity study and which shall not be less than the Statewide annual goal.§ 9604. Duties of Department of General Services.The Department of General Services[, with the assistance of the department,] shall have the following duties:(1) [If feasible, provide] Provide, at the discretion of the Secretary of General Services, appropriate staff, who shall be responsible to the Department of General Services and who shall [serve within designated Commonwealth agencies to assist veteran-owned small businesses and service-disabled veteran-owned small businesses] assist veteran business enterprises in this Commonwealth in learning how to do business with Commonwealth agencies.(2) Give special publicity to procurement procedures and issue special publications designed to assist [veteran-owned small businesses and service-disabled veteran-owned small businesses] veteran business enterprises in learning how to do business with Commonwealth agencies.(2.1) Verify the current certification of businesses claiming to be certified as veteran business enterprises.20250HB1760PN2168 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) [Compile, maintain and make available source lists of veteran-owned small businesses and service-disabled veteran-owned small businesses] Develop and maintain a directory of veteran business enterprises for the purpose of encouraging procurement from [veteran-owned small businesses] veteran business enterprises.(4) Include [veteran-owned small businesses and service-disabled veteran-owned small businesses] veteran business enterprises on solicitation mailing lists.(5) Assure that [veteran-owned small businesses and service-disabled veteran-owned small businesses are solicited] purchasing agencies solicit veteran business enterprises on procurements for which the businesses may be suited.(6) Develop [special] training programs to assist [veteran-owned small businesses and service-disabled veteran-owned small businesses] veteran business enterprises in learning how to do business with Commonwealth agencies.[(7) Assure that participation by veteran-owned small businesses and service-disabled veteran-owned small businesses is, if appropriate, factored into the evaluation of proposals for supplies, services or construction when a purchasing agency uses the competitive sealed proposals method under 62 Pa.C.S. § 513 (relating to competitive sealed proposals).(8) Verify the current certification of businesses claiming to be certified as veteran-owned small businesses and service-disabled veteran-owned small businesses.](9) Establish contract-specific goals for utilization of veteran business enterprises, in collaboration with the 20250HB1760PN2168 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purchasing agency, based upon relevant factors, including the availability of veteran business enterprises to provide the supplies, materials and equipment or services required by the scope of work of the procurement.(10) In collaboration with the purchasing agency, review utilization schedules, consider requests for waivers of contract-specific goals based upon a showing of all efforts and evaluate the extent to which contract-specific goals were achieved.(11) Monitor contracts to evaluate compliance with contract-specific goals and commitments.(12) Cooperate with and provide assistance to Commonwealth agencies to facilitate participation by veteran business enterprises in procurements.(13) Receive, review and act upon complaints and suggestions concerning the utilization of veteran business enterprises, with the assistance of the purchasing agency, as appropriate.(14) Monitor and evaluate the Commonwealth's utilization of veteran business enterprises and the Commonwealth's progress toward the aspirational target.§ 9605. Bonding and progress payments.(a) Bonding.--Notwithstanding 62 Pa.C.S. Pt. I (relating to Commonwealth Procurement Code) or any other law or regulation:(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a purchasing agency may reduce the [level] amount or change the types of bonding normally required or accept alternative forms of security to the extent reasonably necessary to encourage procurement from [veteran-owned small businesses and service-disabled veteran-owned small businesses] veteran business 20250HB1760PN2168 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enterprises.(2) For contracts under $25,000, [veteran-owned small businesses and service-disabled veteran-owned small businesses] veteran business enterprises shall be exempt from any bonding requirements.(b) Progress payments.--A purchasing agency may make special provisions for progress payments as it deems reasonably necessary to encourage procurement from [veteran-owned small businesses and service-disabled veteran-owned small businesses] veteran business enterprises.§ 9606. [(Reserved).] Request for full or partial waiver of contract-specific goal.Notwithstanding any provision of this subchapter, bidders or offerors may request a partial or full waiver of a contract-specific goal for veteran business enterprise participation for any unmet portion of a contract-specific goal. The following apply:(1) A bidder or offeror requesting a partial or full waiver shall submit, in writing, a report detailing all efforts to meet the contract-specific goal as required by the solicitation.(2) In reviewing a bidder's or offeror's written request for a partial or full waiver of a contract-specific goal, the purchasing agency, based on the recommendation of the Department of General Services, shall determine if a bidder or offeror has made all efforts to meet the contract-specific goal and whether the waiver request should be granted.(3) In determining if a bidder or offeror has made all efforts, the purchasing agency and the Department of General Services may consider levels of participation by veteran 20250HB1760PN2168 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 business enterprises by other bidders or offerors.§ 9607. Reports.[(a) Report to Department of General Services.--By August 15, 2013, and each August 15 thereafter, each executive agency and independent agency shall submit an annual report for the period of July 1 to June 30 to the Department of General Services on actual utilization of veteran-owned small businesses and service-disabled veteran-owned small businesses as contractors, subcontractors, suppliers and professional service providers.(b) Report to standing committees.--(1) The Department of General Services and each State-affiliated entity shall annually, before October 1, report in writing to the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate and the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives the actual utilization, Statewide and by each purchasing agency, of veteran-owned small businesses and service-disabled veteran-owned small businesses during the preceding fiscal year.(2) The report shall include a list of all veteran-owned small businesses and service-disabled veteran-owned small businesses that participated as contractors, subcontractors, suppliers and professional service providers during the preceding fiscal year.(3) Initial reports under this subsection shall be submitted to the standing committees by October 1, 2013.](c) Annual report.--(1) The Department of General Services shall annually report in writing to the Veterans Affairs and Emergency 20250HB1760PN2168 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Preparedness Committee of the Senate and the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives concerning the utilization of veteran business enterprises in Commonwealth contracts.(2) Each annual report shall include statistical information regarding veteran business enterprises, including business classification, location and industry.(3) In preparing an annual report, the Department of General Services shall verify if commitments made to veteran business enterprises in the course of awarding the contracts have been maintained or achieved.Section 2. Title 51 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9609. Disparity study.In conjunction with the schedule for the disparity study completed on June 30, 2024, and every five years thereafter, the Department of General Services shall complete a Statewide disparity study on the availability and utilization of veteran business enterprises, the results of which may be used to set an aspirational target under section 9603 (relating to Statewide participation goal and aspirational target ). Section 3. Chapter 21 heading and sections 2101 and 2102 of Title 62 are amended to read:CHAPTER 21SMALL [AND DISADVANTAGED] DIVERSE BUSINESSES§ 2101. Policy.The policy of this Commonwealth is to assist [small and disadvantaged businesses in learning how to do business with Commonwealth agencies. The department shall implement this policy in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department.] small businesses and small diverse businesses in 20250HB1760PN2168 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 learning how to do business with Commonwealth agencies. The department shall implement this policy in accordance with department regulations and policy.§ 2102. Definitions.Subject to section 2103 (relating to policy and regulations), the following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agency liaison." An agency employee reporting directly to a secretary, agency head or equivalent responsible for assisting the agency on issues related to the program."Aspirational target." A target established by the Secretary of General Services under section 2109 (relating to aspirational target)."Contract-specific goal." A goal established by the department in collaboration with the purchasing agency for utilization of small diverse businesses on a specific procurement.["Disadvantaged business." A small business which is owned or controlled by a majority of persons, not limited to members of minority groups, who have been deprived of the opportunity to develop and maintain a competitive position in the economy because of social disadvantages.]"Disparity study." A study conducted to determine whether there is a disparity between the availability and utilization of small diverse businesses in Commonwealth procurement."Program." The Small Diverse Business Program established under section 2102.1 (relating to Small Diverse Business Program)."Race-neutral and gender-neutral measures." Methodologies 20250HB1760PN2168 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that are or can be used to assist businesses, notwithstanding the social, economic, racial or gender composition of the individuals that own or control the business."Small business." A business in the United States which is independently owned[,] and is not dominant in its field of operation and employs [100] 500 or fewer employees."Small diverse business." A small business owned or controlled by a majority of persons, not limited to members of minority groups, that have been deprived of the opportunity to develop and maintain a competitive position in the economy because of economic and social disadvantages."Utilization schedule." A document, submitted by a bidder or offeror as part of a bid or proposal, in which a bidder or offeror commits to a level of small diverse business participation for a contract, identifies the associated responsibilities and scopes of work and identifies the dollar value or percentages of the work to be performed.Section 4. Title 62 is amended by adding sections to read:§ 2102.1. Small Diverse Business Program.The Small Diverse Business Program is established within the department to assist small diverse businesses in accordance with this chapter.§ 2102.2. Nonapplicability.Beginning on the effective date of this section, this chapter shall not apply to procurements for construction and design professional services.Section 5. Sections 2103 and 2104 of Title 62 are amended to read:§ 2103. [Regulations] Policy and regulations.[The] To implement the program, the department shall 20250HB1760PN2168 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 establish policy for executive and those independent agencies for which the department acts as purchasing agency and may promulgate regulations. [establishing detailed definitions of the words and phrases defined in section 2102 (relating to definitions) using, in addition to the criteria set forth in section 2102, other criteria as it deems appropriate, including the number of employees and the dollar volume of business. State-affiliated entities shall implement the policy for their procurement programs.] The policy may establish detailed definitions of the words and phrases defined under section 2102 (relating to definitions) using, in addition to the criteria specified under section 2102, other criteria as the department deems appropriate, including the number of employees and the dollar volume of business. State-affiliated entities shall implement the policy for their procurement.§ 2104. Duties of department.[The department shall have the following duties:(1) Where feasible, provide appropriate staff who shall be responsible to the department and who shall serve within designated Commonwealth agencies to assist small and disadvantaged businesses in this Commonwealth in learning how to do business with Commonwealth agencies.(2) Give special publicity to procurement procedures and issue special publications designed to assist small and disadvantaged businesses in learning how to do business with Commonwealth agencies.(3) Compile, maintain and make available source lists of small and disadvantaged businesses for the purpose of encouraging procurement from small and disadvantaged businesses.20250HB1760PN2168 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Include small and disadvantaged businesses on solicitation mailing lists.(5) Assure that small and disadvantaged businesses are solicited on each procurement for which the businesses may be suited.(6) Develop special training programs to assist small and disadvantaged businesses in learning how to do business with Commonwealth agencies.] The department shall administer the program. The department's duties shall include:(1) Formulating, proposing and implementing policy and regulations for the development, implementation and monitoring of the program, including the process or procedures to govern the following:(i) The process and criteria for certification, verification, recertification and decertification of small businesses and small diverse businesses.(ii) The setting of contract-specific goals.(iii) Changes to solicitation and contract language, requirements and forms.(iv) Monitoring and tracking contract commitments and utilization of small diverse businesses.(v) Mentor-protégé programs.(vi) Program-related education, training, networking and outreach.(vii) Any other processes or procedures the department deems necessary to implement the program.(2) Developing, using and assisting purchasing agencies in using race-neutral and gender-neutral measures to facilitate the participation of all businesses in Commonwealth procurement activities, including the 20250HB1760PN2168 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 implementation of a program to reserve procurements for award to self-certified small businesses only.(3) Developing and maintaining a directory of small businesses and small diverse businesses.(4) Providing information and assistance to small businesses and small diverse businesses relating to the program, including special training programs to assist small businesses and small diverse businesses in learning how to do business with Commonwealth agencies and serving as liaison to community, contractors, professionals and supplier groups, associations and organizations.(5) Collaborating with and providing information and assistance to Commonwealth agencies to facilitate participation by small businesses and small diverse businesses in procurements.(6) Establishing thresholds for procurements which require the setting of contract-specific goals.(7) Ensuring that small diverse businesses are solicited on procurements for which the businesses may be suited.(8) Establishing contract-specific goals, in collaboration with the purchasing agency, based upon relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the availability of small diverse businesses to provide the supplies, materials and equipment or services required by the scope of work of the procurement.(9) In collaboration with the purchasing agency, reviewing utilization schedules, considering requests for waivers of contract-specific goals based upon a showing of all efforts and evaluating the extent to which contract-specific goals were achieved.20250HB1760PN2168 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (10) Monitoring contracts to evaluate compliance with contract-specific goals and commitments.(11) Receiving, reviewing and acting upon complaints and suggestions concerning the program, with the assistance of the purchasing agency, as appropriate.(12) Coordinating with agency liaisons on agency issues related to the program.(13) Evaluating the effectiveness and utility of the program.(14) Monitoring the program and the Commonwealth's progress toward the aspirational target.(15) Identifying barriers to participation by small diverse businesses in Commonwealth procurement.(16) Providing appropriate staff, in the discretion of the Secretary of General Services, to assist small diverse businesses in this Commonwealth in learning how to do business with Commonwealth agencies.Section 6. Title 62 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2104.1. Request for full or partial waiver of contract-specific goal.Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, bidders or offerors may request a partial or full waiver of a contract-specific goal for small diverse business participation. The following apply:(1) A bidder or offeror requesting a partial or full waiver shall submit, in writing, a report detailing all of the bidder's or offeror's efforts to meet the contract-specific goal as required by the solicitation.(2) In reviewing a bidder's or offeror's written request for a partial or full waiver of a contract-specific goal, the 20250HB1760PN2168 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purchasing agency, based on the recommendation of the department, shall determine if a bidder or offeror has made all efforts to meet the contract-specific goal and to what extent the waiver request should be granted.(3) In determining if a bidder or offeror has made all efforts, the purchasing agency and the department may consider levels of participation by small diverse businesses by other bidders or offerors.Section 7. Sections 2105 and 2107 of Title 62 are amended to read:§ 2105. Bonding and progress payments.(a) Bonding.--[Notwithstanding other provisions of this part, a] A purchasing agency may reduce the [level] amount or change the types of bonding normally required or accept alternative forms of security to the extent reasonably necessary to encourage procurement from [small and disadvantaged businesses] small businesses and small diverse businesses.(b) Progress payments.--A purchasing agency may make special provisions for progress payments as it deems reasonably necessary to encourage procurement from [small and disadvantaged businesses] small businesses and small diverse businesses.§ 2107. Report to General Assembly.The department shall annually[, before October 1,] submit a report in writing to the General Assembly concerning the awarding of contracts [to small and disadvantaged businesses] and subcontracts to small businesses and small diverse businesses during the preceding fiscal year. The report shall include [a list of all small and disadvantaged businesses that participated as contractors, subcontractors or suppliers during the preceding fiscal year for contracts if the number of 20250HB1760PN2168 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contractors under a previously existing contract for the same supply or service is reduced to a single contractor or reduced by more than 50% of the number existing on September 30, 2003.] statistical information regarding the program and information regarding small businesses and small diverse businesses, including business classification, location and industry. In preparing the report, the department shall verify whether commitments made to small [and disadvantaged] diverse businesses in the course of awarding these contracts have been maintained or achieved.Section 8. Title 62 is amended by adding sections to read:§ 2109. Aspirational target.The Secretary of General Services shall set an aspirational target for small diverse business participation by the Commonwealth, which shall be reviewed and adjusted every five years upon completion of a disparity study.§ 2110. Disparity study.(a) Requirement.--In conjunction with the schedule for the disparity study completed on June 30, 2024, and at least once every five years thereafter, the department shall complete a Statewide disparity study on the availability and utilization of small diverse businesses, the results of which shall be used to set an aspirational target under section 2109 (relating to aspirational target).(b) Notice and publication.--The Secretary of General Services shall transmit notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin regarding whether or not the disparity study shows a statistically significant disparity.§ 2111. Program expiration.20250HB1760PN2168 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 This chapter shall expire December 31, 2030 , unless the disparity study shows a statistically significant disparity in the utilization of small diverse businesses.Section 9. Title 62 is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 21APARTICIPATION PROGRAM FOR CONSTRUCTION ANDDESIGN PROFESSIONAL SERVICESSec.21A01. Definitions.21A02. Participation Program for Construction and Design Professional Services.21A03. Applicability.21A04. Policy and regulations.21A05. Duties of department.21A06. Request for full or partial waiver of contract-specific goal.21A07. Bonding and progress payments.21A08. Report to General Assembly.21A09. Aspirational target.21A10. Disparity study.21A11. Compliance with Federal requirements.21A12. Expiration.§ 21A01. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Aspirational target." A target established by the Secretary of General Services under section 21A09 (relating to aspirational target)."Contract-specific goal." A goal established by the 20250HB1760PN2168 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department in collaboration with the purchasing agency for utilization of small diverse businesses on a specific procurement."Disparity study." A study conducted to determine whether there is a disparity between the availability and utilization of small diverse businesses in Commonwealth procurement for construction and design professional services."Program." The Participation Program for Construction and Design Professional Services established under section 21A02 (relating to Participation Program for Construction and Design Professional Services)."Race-neutral and gender-neutral measures." Methodologies that are or can be used to assist businesses, notwithstanding the social, economic, racial or gender composition of individuals that own or control the business."Small business." A business in the United States which is independently owned and is not dominant in its field of operation and employs 500 or fewer employees."Small diverse business." A small business owned or controlled by a majority of persons, not limited to members of minority groups, who have been deprived of the opportunity to develop and maintain a competitive position in the economy because of economic and social disadvantages."Utilization schedule." A document, submitted by a bidder or offeror as part of a bid or proposal, in which a bidder or offeror commits to a level of small diverse business participation for a contract, identifies the associated responsibilities and scope of work and identifies the dollar value or percentages of the work to be performed.§ 21A02. Participation Program for Construction and Design 20250HB1760PN2168 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Professional Services.The Participation Program for Construction and Design Professional Services is established in the department.§ 21A03. Applicability.This chapter shall apply to procurements for construction and design professional services.§ 21A04. Policy and regulations.To implement the program, the department shall establish policy for executive and independent agencies for which the department acts as a purchasing agency and may promulgate regulations. The policies and regulations may establish detailed definitions of the words and phrases defined in section 21A01 (relating to definitions) using, in addition to the criteria specified under section 21A01, other criteria as the department deems appropriate, including the number of employees and the dollar volume of business. State-affiliated entities shall implement the policy for their procurement programs.§ 21A05. Duties of department.The department shall administer the program. The department's duties shall include:(1) Formulating, proposing and implementing policy and regulations for the development, implementation and monitoring of the program, which shall include processes or procedures to govern the following:(i) The process and criteria for certification, verification, recertification and decertification of small businesses and small diverse businesses.(ii) The setting of contract-specific goals.(iii) Changes to solicitation and contract language, requirements and forms.20250HB1760PN2168 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) Monitoring and tracking contract commitments and utilization of small diverse businesses.(v) Mentor-protégé programs. (vi) Program-related education, training, networking and outreach.(vii) Any other processes or procedures the department deems necessary to implement the program for construction and design professional services.(2) Developing, using and assisting purchasing agencies in using race-neutral and gender-neutral measures to facilitate the participation of businesses in Commonwealth procurement activities, including the implementation of a program to reserve procurements for award to small diverse businesses only.(3) Providing information and assistance to small businesses and small diverse businesses relating to the program, including special training programs to assist small businesses and small diverse businesses in learning how to do business with Commonwealth agencies and serving as a liaison to community, contractors, professionals and supplier groups, associations and organizations.(4) Establishing thresholds for construction and design professional services procurements which require the setting of contract-specific goals.(5) Ensuring that small diverse businesses are solicited on procurements for which the businesses may be suited.(6) Establishing contract-specific goals, in collaboration with the purchasing agency, based upon relevant factors, including the availability of small diverse businesses to provide the supplies, materials and equipment 20250HB1760PN2168 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or services required by the scope of work of the procurement.(7) In collaboration with the purchasing agency, reviewing utilization schedules, considering requests for waivers of contract-specific goals based upon a showing of all efforts and evaluating the extent to which contract-specific goals were achieved.(8) Monitoring contracts to evaluate compliance with contract-specific goals and commitments.(9) Receiving, reviewing and acting upon complaints and suggestions concerning the program, with the assistance of the purchasing agency, as appropriate.(10) Evaluating the effectiveness and utility of the program.(11) Monitoring the program and the Commonwealth's progress toward the aspirational target.(12) Identifying barriers to equitable participation by small diverse businesses in Commonwealth procurements for construction and design professional services.(13) Providing appropriate staff, in the discretion of the Secretary of General Services, to assist small diverse businesses in this Commonwealth in learning how to do business with Commonwealth agencies.(14) Developing and maintaining a directory of small businesses and small diverse businesses.(15) Collaborating with and providing information and assistance to Commonwealth agencies to facilitate participation by small businesses and small diverse businesses in construction and design professional services procurements.(16) Developing the conditions under which a contract-20250HB1760PN2168 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 specific goal may be waived, either partially or fully, upon request of a bidder or offeror in accordance with section 21A06 (relating to request for full or partial waiver of contract-specific goal).§ 21A06. Request for full or partial waiver of contract-specific goal.Bidders or offerors may request a partial or full waiver of a contract-specific goal for small diverse business participation. The following apply:(1) A bidder or offeror requesting a partial or full waiver shall submit, in writing, a report detailing all of the bidder's or offeror's efforts to meet the contract-specific goal as required by the solicitation.(2) In reviewing a bidder's or offeror's written request for a partial or full waiver of a contract-specific goal, the purchasing agency, based on the recommendation of the department, shall determine if a bidder or offeror has made all efforts to meet the contract-specific goal and if the waiver request should be granted.(3) In determining if a bidder or offeror has made all efforts, the purchasing agency and the department may consider levels of participation by small diverse businesses by other bidders or offerors.§ 21A07. Bonding and progress payments.(a) Bonding.--A purchasing agency may reduce the level or change the types of bonding normally required or accept alternative forms of security to the extent reasonably necessary to encourage procurement from small businesses and small diverse businesses.(b) Progress payments.--A purchasing agency may make special 20250HB1760PN2168 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provisions for progress payments as it deems reasonably necessary to encourage procurement from small businesses and small diverse businesses.§ 21A08. Report to General Assembly.The department shall annually submit a report in writing to the General Assembly regarding the awarding of contracts and subcontracts to small businesses and small diverse businesses during the preceding fiscal year. The following apply:(1) The report shall include statistical data from the program, including business classification, location and industry.(2) In preparing the report, the department shall verify if the commitments made in the awarding of contracts were maintained or achieved.§ 21A09. Aspirational target.The Secretary of General Services shall set an aspirational target for small diverse business participation by the Commonwealth on procurements subject to this chapter, which shall be reviewed and adjusted every five years upon completion of a disparity study.§ 21A10. Disparity study.(a) Requirement.-- In conjunction with the schedule for the disparity study completed on June 30, 2024 , and at least once every five years thereafter, the department shall complete a Statewide disparity study on the availability and utilization of small diverse businesses in Commonwealth construction and design professional services, the results of which shall be used to set an aspirational target under section 21A09 (relating to aspirational target).(b) Notice and publication.--The Secretary of General 20250HB1760PN2168 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Services shall transmit notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin regarding whether or not the disparity study shows a statistically significant disparity in the utilization of small diverse businesses.§ 21A11. Compliance with Federal requirements.If a procurement involves the expenditure of Federal assistance or contract money, the purchasing agency shall comply with Federal law and authorized regulations which are mandatorily applicable and which are not presently reflected in this chapter.§ 21A12. Expiration.This chapter shall expire December 31, 2030 , unless the disparity study shows a statistically significant disparity in the utilization of small diverse businesses.Section 10. Section 303(a.4) of Title 74 is amended to read:§ 303. Diverse business participation.* * *(a.4) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede, nullify or otherwise affect 51 Pa.C.S. § 9603 (relating to [participation goal] Statewide participation goal and aspirational target). In the case of an inconsistency between this section and 51 Pa.C.S. Ch. 96 (relating to veteran-owned small businesses), the provisions of 51 Pa.C.S. Ch. 96 shall prevail.* * *Section 11. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1760PN2168 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627